test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UHL_STEM_3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲áaguhl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UHL_STEM_3

     k̲áaguhl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲áagwaalaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲áagwaalaan
     k̲áaguhl+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲áagwaalaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲áagwaalaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲áagwaal'ahlanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲áagwaal'ahlanggan
     k̲áaguhl+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲áagwaal'ahlanggiinii
     k̲áaguhl+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲áagwaal'ahlans
     k̲áaguhl+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲áagwaalaa'ahlang
     k̲áaguhl+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲áagwaalaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲áagwaalaa'ahlanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+REFLEXIVE: k̲áagwaal'ahl
